src/fst/affixes/VTA_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTA_Prefix_WB
%<%< VTA_Stems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                                    !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTA, Stem Type = Regular   !!
!!                                                    !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Regular_Subclass
+VTA:0 VTA_Regular_Flags ;

LEXICON VTA_Regular_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTA_Regular_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VTA_Regular_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VTA_Regular_ni_WB ;
@R.Prefix.o@ VTA_Regular_o_WB ;

LEXICON VTA_Regular_gi_WB
0:%>%> VTA_Regular_gi_Endings ;

LEXICON VTA_Regular_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+2Pl:igosiinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+2Sg:igosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+Incl:igosiiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+2Pl:igosiinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+2Sg:igosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+Incl:igosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl:isinooninimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg:isinooninaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg:isiimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwaawaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl:isiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg:isiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl:isiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl:igosiiwaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg:igosiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl:igosiinaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl:igosiiwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg:igosiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl:igosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl:igoosiimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg:igoosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl:igoosiimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg:igoosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl:igoosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+2Pl:igosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+2Sg:igosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+Incl:igosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+2Pl:igosiinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+2Sg:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+Incl:igosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl:isinooninim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg:isinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg:isiim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwaawaag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl:isiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg:isiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl:isiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl:igosiiwaag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg:igosiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl:igosiinaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl:igosiiwaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl:igosiinaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl:igoosiim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg:igoosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl:igoosiim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg:igoosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl:igoosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+2Pl:igosiinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+2Sg:igosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+Incl:igosiiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+2Pl:igosiinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+2Sg:igosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+Incl:igosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl:isinooninimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg:isinooninaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg:isiimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwaawaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl:isiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg:isiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl:isiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl:igosiiwaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg:igosiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl:igosiinaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl:igosiiwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg:igosiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl:igosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl:igoosiimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg:igoosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl:igoosiimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg:igoosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl:igoosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+2Pl:igonaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+2Sg:igonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+Incl:igominaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+2Pl:igonaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+2Sg:igonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+Incl:igominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl:ininimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg:ininaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg:imwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx:aawaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx:aawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl:iminaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg:inaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx:aadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx:aadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl:iminaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl:igowaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg:igodogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl:igonaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl:igowaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg:igodog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl:igonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl:igoomwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg:igoonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx:aanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx:aanaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl:igoomwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg:igoonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl:igoominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+2Pl:igonaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+2Sg:igonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+Incl:igomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+2Pl:igonaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+2Sg:igon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+Incl:igomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl:ininim # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg:in # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg:im # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx:aawaag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx:aawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl:imin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx:aag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx:aa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl:imin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl:igowaag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg:igoog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl:igonaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl:igowaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg:ig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl:igonaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl:igoom # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg:igoo # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx:aanaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx:aanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl:igoom # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg:igoo # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl:igoomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+2Pl:igonaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+2Sg:igonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+Incl:igominaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+2Pl:igonaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+2Sg:igonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+Incl:igominaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl:ininimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg:ininaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg:imwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx:aawaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx:aawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl:iminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg:inaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx:aabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx:aaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl:iminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl:igowaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg:igobaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl:igonaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl:igowaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg:igoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl:igonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl:igoomwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg:igoonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx:aanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx:aanaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl:igoomwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg:igoonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl:igoominaaban # ;

LEXICON VTA_Regular_o_WB
0:%>%> VTA_Regular_o_Endings ;

LEXICON VTA_Regular_o_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3SgProx:igonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igodogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3SgProx:igon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igoon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3SgProx:igonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aabanen # ;

LEXICON VTA_Regular_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTA_Regular_ni_Endings ;
